Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-7,105
Fees charged for dental services;
prohibited acts.

Notwithstanding
section 44-3,131, (1) an individual or group sickness or accident policy,
certificate, or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed
in this state and a hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy,
(2) a self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal
law, and (3) a certificate, agreement, or contract to provide limited health
services issued by a prepaid limited health service organization as defined
in section 44-4702 shall not include a provision, stipulation, or agreement
establishing or limiting any fees charged for dental services that are not
covered by the policy, certificate, contract, agreement, or plan.

Laws 2012, LB810, § 1.